District of Columbia statutes.
28-2304

General assignments including choses in action.

In a general assignment which includes choses in action, it is not necessary to execute a separate assignment of each chose in action, but the assignee, by virtue of the general assignment, may sue in his own name on the several choses in action included therein.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 670, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1
1981 Ed., § 28-2304.
1973 Ed., § 28-2304.